Tennessee, session 114, SB2068.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-412, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(c) Each LEA shall submit a report to the department by July 31 each year that
includes the number of students the LEA provided with information on career and
technical education opportunities pursuant to subdivision (b)(3) in the immediately
preceding school year.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2068
011394
- 1 -